Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
LIENS, GENERALLY

Animals, Care
of

§507-1 Animals, lien for care of.
Whoever pastures, feeds, or shelters animals by virtue of a contract with or by
the consent of the owner of the animals for a compensation agreed upon, has a
lien on the animals for pasturing, feeding, or sheltering to secure payment
thereof with costs. [L 1892, c 9, §1; RL 1925, §2901; RL 1935, §4350; RL 1945,
§8751; RL 1955, §193-1; HRS §507-1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next